test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-natew_gt-norm.yaml
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: [nâticik, nâticik]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: [nâtiskik, nâtiskik]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: [nâtikoyâhkik, nâtikoyâhkik]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: [nâtikoyahkok, nâtikoyahkok]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: [nâtikoyêkok, nâtikoyêkok]

     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: [nâtitân, nâtitân]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: [nâtitâhk, nâtitâhk]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: [nâtitakok, nâtitakok]

     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [nâtikot, nâtikot]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [nâtikocik, nâtikocik]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: [nâtikoyit, nâtikoyit]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: [nâtiyit, nâtiyit]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: [nâtiyisk, nâtiyisk]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: [nâtikoyâhk, nâtikoyâhk, nâtikowâyâhk, nâtikowâyâhk]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: [nâtikoyêk, nâtikoyêk, nâtikowâyêk, nâtikowâyêk]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: [nâtikoyahk, nâtikoyahk, nâtikowâyahk, nâtikowâyahk]
     




     nâtêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: nâs
     nâtêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3SgO: nâtâtân
     nâtêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO: nâtihk
     nâtêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO: nâtik
     nâtêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3PlO: nâtâtânik
     nâtêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO: nâtihkok

     nâtêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO: nâtâhkan
     nâtêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO: nâtâhkahk
     nâtêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO: nâtâhkêk
     nâtêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO: nâtâhkanik
     nâtêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO: nâtâhkahkok
     nâtêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO: nâtâhkêkok

     nâtêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO: nâsin
     nâtêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1PlO: nâsinân
     nâtêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1SgO: nâsik
     nâtêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1SgO: nâsîhkan
     nâtêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1PlO: nâsîhkâhk
     nâtêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1SgO: nâsîhkêk
     
     
     
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+1Sg+3SgO: [niwî-wîci-nâtimâw, niwîwîcinâtimâw]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Sg+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-nâtimâw, kiwîwîcinâtimâw]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+1Pl+3SgO: [niwî-wîci-nâtimânân, niwîwîcinâtimânân]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+12Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-nâtimânaw, kiwîwîcinâtimânaw]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-nâtimâwâw, kiwîwîcinâtimâwâw]
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+1Sg+3PlO: [niwî-wîci-nâtimâwak, niwîwîcinâtimâwak]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Sg+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nâtimâwak, kiwîwîcinâtimâwak]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+1Pl+3PlO: [niwî-wîci-nâtimânânak, niwîwîcinâtimânânak]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+12Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nâtimânawak, kiwîwîcinâtimânawak]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nâtimâwâwak, kiwîwîcinâtimâwâwak]
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Sg+1SgO: [kiwî-wîci-nâsimin, kiwîwîcinâtimin]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nâsiminân, kiwîwîcinâtiminân]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Pl+1SgO: [kiwî-wîci-nâsiminâwâw, kiwîwîcinâtiminâwâw]
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [wî-nâtêw, wînâtêw]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wî-nâtêwak, wînâtêwak]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-nâtêyiwa, wînâtêyiwa]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [wî-nâtimêw, wînâtimêw]
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-nâtimêwak, wînâtimêwak]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-wîci-nâtimimâwa, niwîwîcinâtimimâwa]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nâtimimâwa, kiwîwîcinâtimimâwa]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-wîci-nâtimimânâna, niwîwîcinâtimimânâna]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nâtimimânawa, kiwîwîcinâtimimânawa]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nâtimimâwâwa, kiwîwîcinâtimimâwâwa]
     
     
     
     

     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3SgO: nâtaki
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3SgO: nâtaci
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3SgO: nâtâyâhki
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3SgO: [nâtâyahko, nâtâyahki]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3SgO: nâtâyêko

     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: nâtâci
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: nâtâtwâwi
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: nâtâyici
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3PlO: nâtakwâwi
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3PlO: nâtatwâwi
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3PlO: nâtâyâhkwâwi
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3PlO: nâtâyahkwâwi
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3PlO: nâtâyêkwâwi

     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1SgO: nâtsici
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2SgO: nâtiski
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1PlO: nâtikoyâhki
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+12PlO: [nâtikoyahko, nâtikoyahki]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2PlO: nâtikoyêko
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: nâtikoci
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: nâtikotwâwi 
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: nâtikoyici
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1SgO: nâsitwâwi
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2SgO: nâtiskwâwi
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1PlO: nâtikoyâhkwâwi
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+12PlO: nâtikoyahkwâwi
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2PlO: nâtikoyêkwâwi
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1SgO: nâsiyani
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+1SgO: nâsiyêko
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: nâsiyâhki
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2SgO: nâtitâni
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2PlO: nâtitako
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: nâtitâhki
     
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: nâtimaki
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: nâtimati
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: nâtimâyâhki
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [nâtimâyahko, nâtimâyahki]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: nâtimâyeko

     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: nâtiyiti
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: nâtiyiski
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: [nâtikoyâhki, nâtikowâyâhki]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: [nâtikoyêko, nâtikowâyêko]
     nâtêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: [nâtikoyahko, nâtikoyahki, nâtikowâyahko, nâtikowâyahki]
